Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 2 Transportation by Railroad Companies

Cross references.

Sale of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wine by railway passenger carriers, §§

3-9-1

,

3-9-2

.

46-9-150.
Duty of railroad companies to furnish passengers with drinking water and lights.

Railroad companies shall keep in each passenger car or in any car in which passengers are transported an adequate supply of good, pure drinking water at all hours during the day and night. Any railroad company which violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any conductor or agent of a railroad who, after being requested by a passenger to furnish a sufficient supply of water to the passenger in each car, or a light at night, passes any depot or station without so doing shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be prosecuted in any county through which the railroad of which he is agent or conductor runs.

History.

Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 132, §§ 1, 2; Code 1868, § 4498; Code 1873, § 4585; Code 1882, § 4585; Penal Code 1895, §§ 522, 523; Penal Code 1910, §§ 529, 530; Code 1933, §§ 18-211, 18-9907, 18-9908.

46-9-151.
Duty of railroad companies to telegraph and post bulletins of delayed trains.

Whenever any passenger train on any railroad in this state is more than one-half hour behind its schedule time when it passes a depot at which there is a telegraph operator during the hours such operator is required to be on duty, it shall be the duty of the railroad company to keep posted at every succeeding telegraph station along its line the time such train is behind its schedule, provided that such bulletin shall not be required to be posted at any station until one-half hour before the regularly scheduled time at which such train is to arrive at the station at which such bulletin is required to be kept. For every willful violation of this Code section, the railroad company shall be liable to pay to the state a civil penalty of $20.00, which may be collected by an action in any court having competent jurisdiction.

History.

Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 119, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2235, 2236; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2688, 2689; Code 1933, § 18-214.

46-9-152.
Duty of railroad companies to provide conductors and other employees with baggage checks; duty of conductors to check trunks and baggage.

A railroad company shall have the duty of providing its conductors, agents, or employees with checks so as to check all trunks or separate baggage of passengers from station to station on its roads when required.

It shall be the duty of the conductor of every passenger train to cause, upon application to him, all trunks and baggage to be checked from any station to any point of destination on its road or on any road running under the control of the company of which he is conductor.

If any conductor fails or refuses, upon application, to comply with subsection (b) of this Code section, the railroad company employing that conductor shall be liable for a civil penalty of $50.00 for every such failure or refusal, to be recovered in a court of competent jurisdiction of that county where the demand for check was made.

History.

Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 398; Ga. L. 1857, p. 65, § 1; Code 1868, § 2046; Code 1873, § 2072; Code 1882, § 2072; Civil Code 1895, § 2281; Civil Code 1910, § 2732; Code 1933, § 18-221.

Law reviews.

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).